Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.240

Judgment on cost bond.

Whenever any bond or undertaking for the payment of any costs to any party shall be filed in any action or other legal proceeding in any court in this state and judgment should be rendered for any such costs against the principal on any such bonds or against the party primarily liable therefor in whose behalf any such bond or undertaking has been filed, such judgment for costs shall be rendered against the principal on such bond or the party primarily liable therefor and at the same time also against his or her surety or sureties on any or all such bonds or undertakings filed in any such action or other legal proceeding.

[ 2011 c 336 s 130; 1909 c 173 s 1; RRS s 496.]